Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 7. Virginia College Savings Plan and Able Savings Trust Accounts.
§ 23.1-707.
Prepaid tuition contracts and college and ABLE savings trust agreements.

Each prepaid tuition contract made pursuant to this chapter shall include the following terms and provisions:

The amount of payment or payments and the number of payments required from a purchaser on behalf of a qualified beneficiary;

The terms and conditions under which purchasers shall remit payments, including the dates of such payments;

Provisions for late payment charges, defaults, withdrawals, refunds, and any penalties;

The name and date of birth of the qualified beneficiary on whose behalf the contract is made;

Terms and conditions for a substitution for the qualified beneficiary originally named;

Terms and conditions for termination of the contract, including any refunds, withdrawals, or transfers of tuition prepayments, and the name of the person entitled to terminate the contract;

The time period during which the qualified beneficiary is required to claim benefits from the Plan;

The number of credit hours or quarters, semesters, terms, or units contracted for by the purchaser, as applicable;

All other rights and obligations of the purchaser and the trust; and

Any other terms and conditions that the board deems necessary or appropriate, including those necessary to conform the contract with the requirements of § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which specifies the requirements for qualified state tuition programs.

Each college savings trust agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall include the following terms and provisions:

The maximum and minimum contribution allowed on behalf of each qualified beneficiary for the payment of qualified higher education expenses, as that term is defined in § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or other applicable federal law;

Provisions for withdrawals, refunds, transfers, and any penalties;

The name, address, and date of birth of the qualified beneficiary on whose behalf the savings trust account is opened;

Terms and conditions for a substitution for the qualified beneficiary originally named;

Terms and conditions for termination of the account, including any refunds, withdrawals, or transfers, and applicable penalties, and the name of the person entitled to terminate the account;

The time period during which the qualified beneficiary is required to use benefits from the savings trust account;

All other rights and obligations of the contributor and the Plan; and

Any other terms and conditions that the board deems necessary or appropriate, including those necessary to conform the savings trust account with the requirements of § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or other applicable federal law.

Each ABLE savings trust agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall include the following terms and provisions:

The maximum and minimum annual contribution and maximum account balance allowed on behalf of each qualified beneficiary for the payment of qualified disability expenses, as defined in § 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or other applicable federal law;

Provisions for withdrawals, refunds, transfers, return of excess contributions, and any penalties;

The name, address, and date of birth of the qualified beneficiary on whose behalf the savings trust account is opened;

Terms and conditions for a substitution for the qualified beneficiary originally named;

Terms and conditions for termination of the account, including any transfers to the state upon the death of the qualified beneficiary, refunds, withdrawals, transfers, applicable penalties, and the name of the person entitled to terminate the account;

The time period during which the qualified beneficiary is required to use benefits from the savings trust account;

All other rights and obligations of the contributor and the Plan; and

Any other terms and conditions that the board deems necessary or appropriate, including those necessary to conform the savings trust account with the requirements of § 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or other applicable federal law.

In addition to the provisions required by subsection A, each prepaid tuition contract entered into prior to July 1, 2019, shall include provisions for the application of tuition prepayments (i) at accredited nonprofit independent or private institutions of higher education, including actual interest and income earned on such prepayments, and (ii) at non-Virginia public and accredited nonprofit independent or private institutions of higher education, including principal and reasonable return on such principal as determined by the board. Payments authorized for accredited nonprofit independent or private institutions of higher education shall not exceed the projected highest payment made for tuition at a public institution of higher education in the same academic year, less a fee to be determined by the board. Payments authorized for non-Virginia public and accredited nonprofit independent or private institutions of higher education shall not exceed the projected average payment made for tuition at a public institution of higher education in the same academic year, less a fee to be determined by the board. In no event, however, shall the benefit paid on any prepaid tuition contract entered into prior to July 1, 2019, be less than the sum of tuition prepayments made and a reasonable return on such prepayments to be determined by the board, less any fees determined by the board.

In addition to the provisions required by subsection A, each prepaid tuition contract entered into on or after July 1, 2019, shall include provisions for the application of tuition prepayments, at a rate equal to the percentage of enrollment-weighted average tuition at public institutions of higher education to be determined by the board, at (i) public institutions of higher education, (ii) accredited nonprofit independent or private institutions of higher education, and (iii) non-Virginia public and accredited nonprofit independent or private institutions of higher education. In no event, however, shall the benefit paid on any prepaid tuition contract entered into on or after July 1, 2019, be less than tuition prepayments made, less any fees as determined by the board.

All prepaid tuition contracts and savings trust agreements shall specifically provide that if after a specified period of time the contract or savings trust agreement has not been terminated and the qualified beneficiary’s rights have not been exercised, the board, after making a reasonable effort to contact the purchaser or contributor and the qualified beneficiary or their agents, shall report such unclaimed moneys to the State Treasurer pursuant to §

55.1-2524

.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, money in the Plan is exempt from creditor process, is not liable to attachment, garnishment, or other process, and shall not be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of any purchaser, contributor, or beneficiary. Unless required by federal law, the Commonwealth, its agencies, and its instrumentalities shall not seek payment pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529A from any ABLE savings trust account or its proceeds for benefits provided to the beneficiary of the account and shall not undertake estate recovery from any ABLE savings trust account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529A.
G. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, money in the Plan is exempt from creditor process, is not liable to attachment, garnishment, or other process, and shall not be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of any purchaser, contributor, or beneficiary. Unless required by federal law, the Commonwealth, its agencies, and its instrumentalities shall not seek payment pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529A from any ABLE savings trust account or its proceeds for benefits provided to the beneficiary of the account and shall not undertake estate recovery from any ABLE savings trust account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529A.

Unless prohibited by federal law, the beneficiary of an ABLE savings trust account may appoint a survivor. In the event of the beneficiary’s death, if the survivor is (i) an eligible individual, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529A(e), then such survivor shall become the beneficiary of the ABLE savings trust account or (ii) not an eligible individual, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529A(e), then any proceeds remaining after final distributions have been made on behalf of the deceased beneficiary shall be distributed to the survivor and the account shall be closed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law that requires consideration of one or more financial circumstances of an individual for the purpose of determining (i) the individual’s eligibility to receive any assistance or benefit pursuant to such provision of state law or (ii) the amount of any such assistance or benefit that such individual is eligible to receive pursuant to such provision of state law, any (a) moneys in an ABLE savings trust account for which such individual is the beneficiary, including any interest on such moneys, (b) contributions to an ABLE savings trust account for which such individual is the beneficiary, and (c) distribution for qualified disability expenses for such individual from an ABLE savings trust account for which such individual is the beneficiary shall be disregarded for such purpose with respect to any period during which such individual remains the beneficiary of, makes contributions to, or receives distributions for qualified disability expenses from such ABLE savings trust account.

No prepaid tuition contract or savings trust account shall be assigned for the benefit of creditors, used as security or collateral for any loan, or otherwise subject to alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge.

The board’s decision on any dispute, claim, or action arising out of or relating to a prepaid tuition contract or savings trust agreement made or entered into pursuant to this chapter or benefits under such prepaid tuition contract or savings trust agreement shall be considered a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

and all proceedings related to such dispute, claim, or action shall be conducted pursuant to Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. Judicial review shall be provided exclusively pursuant to Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1994, c. 661, § 23-38.81; 1995, c. 315; 1997, cc. 785, 861; 1999, cc. 485, 518; 2000, cc. 382, 400; 2015, cc. 227, 311; 2016, cc. 588, 639; 2019, cc. 803, 804; 2020, c. 923.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 639, amended former § 23-38.81, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendment by c. 639 has been given effect in this section by adding subsection G and redesignating remaining subsections accordingly.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts
2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-2524” for “55-210.12.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 803 and 804 are identical, and in subdivision A 8, substituted “terms, or units” for “or terms,” and added “as applicable” at the end; in subdivision B 1, substituted “as that term is” for “at eligible institutions, as both such terms are”; in subsection D, inserted “entered into prior to July 1, 2019” preceding “shall include,” and added the last sentence; added subsection E; redesignated former subsections E through I as F through J, respectively; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 923, in subsection G, designated the first paragraph as subdivision G 1 and added subdivision G 2; and in subdivision G 1, deleted “except that the state of residence of the beneficiary of an ABLE savings trust account shall be a creditor of such account in the event of the death of the beneficiary” from the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 23.1-707.1.
Prepaid tuition contracts; pricing reserves; limitations.

As used in this section:“Funded status” means the ratio of the assets of the Plan to the actuarially estimated value of tuition obligations of the Plan, expressed as a percentage.“Pricing reserve” means the percentage by which the actuarially determined prepaid tuition contract price exceeds the amount estimated to meet the actuarially determined tuition obligation for such prepaid tuition contract.

In the event that the funded status of the Plan meets or exceeds 105 percent, the pricing reserve shall not exceed five percent.

In the event that the funded status of the Plan does not meet or exceed 105 percent, the pricing reserve may exceed five percent but shall not exceed 10 percent.

The board shall provide to the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission written notification and a detailed explanation of any change to the pricing reserve within 30 days of such change.

History.

2019, cc. 805, 806.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 23.1-708.
Assets of the Plan exempt from taxation.

The assets of the Plan and their income are exempt from state and local taxation.

History.

1994, c. 661, § 23-38.83; 2000, cc. 382, 400; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-709.
Annual report.

On or before December 15, the board shall post on its website and submit to the Governor, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the House Committees on Appropriations and Finance an annual statement of the receipts, disbursements, and current investments of the Plan for the preceding year. The report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operation of the Plan during the year and shall include a statement of projected receipts, disbursements, investments, and costs for the further operation of the Plan.

History.

1994, c. 661, § 23-38.84; 1995, c. 315; 2000, cc. 382, 400; 2005, c. 633; 2011, cc. 18, 26; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 23.1-710.
Forms and audit of accounts and records.

The accounts and records of the board showing the receipt and disbursement of funds from whatever source derived shall be in such form as the Auditor of Public Accounts prescribes, provided that such accounts correspond as nearly as possible to the accounts and records for such matters maintained by corporate enterprises. The Auditor of Public Accounts or his legally authorized representatives shall annually audit the accounts of the board, and the board shall bear the cost of such audit services.

History.

1994, c. 661, § 23-38.85; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-711.
Admission to institutions not guaranteed; coverage limitations.

Nothing in this chapter or in any prepaid tuition contract or savings trust agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be construed as a promise or guarantee:

By the board or the Commonwealth of any admission to, continued enrollment at, or graduation from any public institution of higher education;

That the beneficiary’s cost of tuition at an institution of higher education will be covered in full by the proceeds of the beneficiary’s prepaid tuition contract, provided, however, that a prepaid tuition contract will cover that portion of tuition that is required under the terms of any such contract based on the tuition prepayments made; or

That any qualified higher education expense will be covered in full by contributions to or earnings on any savings trust account.

History.

1994, c. 661, § 23-38.86; 1999, cc. 485, 518; 2016, c. 588; 2019, cc. 803, 804.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 803 and 804 are identical, and rewrote subdivision 2, which read: “That the beneficiary’s cost of tuition at an institution of higher education other than a public institution of higher education will be covered in full by the proceeds of the beneficiary’s tuition credits; or.”

§ 23.1-712.
Payroll deductions.

The Commonwealth, the agencies and localities of the Commonwealth and their subdivisions, and any employer in the Commonwealth may agree, by contract or otherwise, to remit payments or contributions on behalf of an employee toward prepaid tuition contracts or savings trust accounts through payroll deductions.

History.

1994, c. 661, § 23-38.87; 1999, cc. 485, 518; 2009, cc. 827, 845; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “may agree” for “are authorized to agree.”

§ 23.1-713.
Liberal construction of chapter.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, special, or local law, the provisions of this chapter shall control. This chapter constitutes full and complete authority, without regard to the provisions of any other law, for performing the acts authorized in this chapter and shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this chapter.

History.

2009, cc. 827, 845, § 23-38.87:1; 2016, c. 588.